Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.480

Election of delegates—Ballots.

The issue shall be identified as, "Delegates to a convention for ratification or rejection of a proposed amendment to the United States Constitution, relating . . . . . . . . . . . (stating briefly the substance of amendment proposed for adoption or rejection)." The names of all candidates who have filed in a district shall be printed on the ballots for that district in two separate groups under the headings, "For the amendment" and "Against the amendment." The names of the candidates in each group shall be printed in alphabetical order.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1437. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 70; 1965 c 9 s 29.74.080; prior: 1933 c 181 s 4, part; RRS s 5249-4, part. Formerly RCW 29.74.080.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Ballots: Chapter 29A.36 RCW.